Ohio, session 136, HB418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.05 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.05. The tree, Aesculus globra glabra, commonly 6
known as the "Buckeye" is hereby adopted as the official tree of 7
the state. 8
Section 2. That existing section 5.05 of the Revised Code 9
is hereby repealed. 10